Vermont, session 2025-2026, H353.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 202a is amended to read:
§ 202a. STATE ENERGY POLICY
It is the general policy of the State of Vermont:
(1) To ensure to the greatest extent practicable that Vermont can meet
its energy service needs in a manner that is adequate, reliable, secure, and
sustainable; that ensures affordability and equitable distribution of energy
burden at the household level, and encourages the State’s economic vitality,
the efficient use of energy resources, and cost-effective demand-side
management; and that is environmentally sound.
VT LEG #381053 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.353
2025 Page 2 of 2
(2) To identify and evaluate, on an ongoing basis, resources that will
meet Vermont’s energy service needs in accordance with the principles of
reducing greenhouse gas emissions and least-cost integrated planning,
including efficiency, conservation, beneficial electrification, and load
management alternatives; wise use of renewable resources; and
environmentally sound energy supply.
(3) To meet Vermont’s energy service needs in a manner that will
achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reductions requirements pursuant to
10 V.S.A § 578 and is consistent with the Vermont Climate Action Plan
adopted and updated pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 592.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381053 v.1